Illinois, session 104th, SB3871.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Foster Parent Law is amended by changing 5Section 1-15 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 520/1-15)7    Sec. 1-15. Foster parent rights. A foster parent's rights 8include, but are not limited to, the following:9        (1) The right to be treated with dignity, respect, and 10    consideration as a professional member of the child 11    welfare team.12        (2) The right to be given standardized pre-service 13    training and appropriate ongoing training to meet mutually 14    assessed needs and improve the foster parent's skills.15        (3) The right to be informed as to how to contact the 16    appropriate child placement agency in order to receive 17    information and assistance to access supportive services 18    for children in the foster parent's care.19        (4) The right to receive timely financial 20    reimbursement commensurate with the care needs of the 21    child as specified in the service plan.22        (5) The right to be provided a clear, written 23    understanding of a placement agency's plan concerning the   SB3871- 2 -LRB104 19111 JRC 32556 b1    placement of a child in the foster parent's home. Inherent 2    in this right is the foster parent's responsibility to 3    support activities that will promote the child's right to 4    relationships with the child's own family and cultural 5    heritage.6        (6) The right to be provided a fair, timely, and 7    impartial investigation of complaints concerning the 8    foster parent's licensure, to be provided the opportunity 9    to have a person of the foster parent's choosing present 10    during the investigation, and to be provided due process 11    during the investigation; the right to be provided the 12    opportunity to request and receive mediation or an 13    administrative review of decisions that affect licensing 14    parameters, or both mediation and an administrative 15    review; and the right to have decisions concerning a 16    licensing corrective action plan specifically explained 17    and tied to the licensing standards violated.18        (7) The right, at any time during which a child is 19    placed with the foster parent, to receive additional or 20    necessary information that is relevant to the care of the 21    child.22        (7.5) The right to be given information concerning a 23    child (i) from the Department as required under subsection 24    (u) of Section 5 of the Children and Family Services Act 25    and (ii) from a child welfare agency as required under 26    subsection (c-5) of Section 7.4 of the Child Care Act of   SB3871- 3 -LRB104 19111 JRC 32556 b1    1969. 2        (8) The right to be notified of scheduled meetings and 3    staffings concerning the foster child in order to actively 4    participate in the case planning and decision-making 5    process regarding the child, including individual service 6    planning meetings, administrative case reviews, 7    interdisciplinary staffings, and individual educational 8    planning meetings; the right to be informed of decisions 9    made by the courts or the child welfare agency concerning 10    the child; the right to provide input concerning the plan 11    of services for the child and to have that input given full 12    consideration in the same manner as information presented 13    by any other professional on the team; and the right to 14    communicate with other professionals who work with the 15    foster child within the context of the team, including 16    therapists, physicians, attending health care 17    professionals, and teachers.18        (9) The right to be given, in a timely and consistent 19    manner, any information a caseworker has regarding the 20    child and the child's family which is pertinent to the 21    care and needs of the child and to the making of a 22    permanency plan for the child. Disclosure of information 23    concerning the child's family shall be limited to that 24    information that is essential for understanding the needs 25    of and providing care to the child in order to protect the 26    rights of the child's family. When a positive relationship   SB3871- 4 -LRB104 19111 JRC 32556 b1    exists between the foster parent and the child's family, 2    the child's family may consent to disclosure of additional 3    information.4        (10) The right to be given reasonable written notice 5    of (i) any change in a child's case plan, (ii) plans to 6    terminate the placement of the child with the foster 7    parent, and (iii) the reasons for the change or 8    termination in placement. The notice shall be waived only 9    in cases of a court order or when the child is determined 10    to be at imminent risk of harm.11        (11) The right to be notified in a timely and complete 12    manner of all court hearings, including notice of the date 13    and time of the court hearing, the name of the judge or 14    hearing officer hearing the case, the location of the 15    hearing, and the court docket number of the case; and the 16    right to intervene in court proceedings or to seek 17    mandamus under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.18        (12) The right to be considered as a placement option 19    when a foster child who was formerly placed with the 20    foster parent is to be re-entered into foster care, if 21    that placement is consistent with the best interest of the 22    child and other children in the foster parent's home.23        (13) The right to have timely access to the child 24    placement agency's existing appeals process and the right 25    to be free from acts of harassment and retaliation by any 26    other party when exercising the right to appeal.  SB3871- 5 -LRB104 19111 JRC 32556 b1        (14) The right to be informed of the Foster Parent 2    Hotline established under Section 35.6 of the Children and 3    Family Services Act and all of the rights accorded to 4    foster parents concerning reports of misconduct by 5    Department employees, service providers, or contractors, 6    confidential handling of those reports, and investigation 7    by the Inspector General appointed under Section 35.5 of 8    the Children and Family Services Act.9        (15) (Blank.) The right to timely training necessary 10    to meet the hair care needs of the children placed in the 11    foster parent's care. 12(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-850, eff. 1-1-25; 13104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 14    Section 10. The Adoption Act is amended by changing 15Section 18.4 as follows: 16    (750 ILCS 50/18.4)  (from Ch. 40, par. 1522.4)17    Sec. 18.4. Information provided to adoptive parents. (a) 18The agency, Department of Children and Family Services, Court 19Supportive Services, Juvenile Division of the Circuit Court, 20or the Probation Officers of the Circuit Court involved in the 21adoption proceedings shall give in writing the following 22non-identifying information, if known, to the adoptive parents 23not later than the date of placement with the petitioning 24adoptive parents: (i) age of biological parents; (ii) their   SB3871- 6 -LRB104 19111 JRC 32556 b1race, religion and ethnic background; (iii) general physical 2appearance of biological parents; (iv) their education, 3occupation, hobbies, interests and talents; (v) existence of 4any other children born to the biological parents; (vi) 5information about biological grandparents; reason for 6emigrating into the United States, if applicable, and country 7of origin; (vii) relationship between biological parents; 8(viii) detailed medical and mental health histories of the 9child, the biological parents, and their immediate relatives; 10(ix) the actual date and place of birth of the adopted person; 11and (x) the reason or reasons the birth parent or parents 12stated for placing the child for adoption, how and why the 13adoptive parent or parents were selected and who selected the 14adoptive parent or parents, and whether the birth parent or 15parents requested or agreed to post-adoption contact with the 16child at the time of placement, and, if so, the frequency and 17type of contact; (xi) and whether the child was placed in 18foster care before adoption, and if so, available information 19about significant developmental milestones observed or 20documented that occurred while the child was placed under the 21custody and guardianship of the Department. This information 22may include, but is not limited to, the child's first steps, 23first words, toilet training, and other notable developmental 24progress. However, no information provided under this 25subsection shall disclose the name or last known address of 26the biological parents, grandparents, the siblings of the   SB3871- 7 -LRB104 19111 JRC 32556 b1biological parents, the adopted person, or any other relative 2of the adopted person. Disclosure under this subsection is 3subject to applicable State or federal confidentiality laws. 4On or before January 1, 2027, the Department of Children and 5Family Services shall adopt any rules necessary to implement 6the changes made to this subsection by this amendatory Act of 7the 104th General Assembly. 8    (b) Any adoptee 18 years of age or over shall be given the 9information in subsection (a) upon request.10    (c) The Illinois Adoption Registry shall release any 11non-identifying information listed in (a) of this Section that 12appears on the certified copy of the original birth 13certificate or the Certificate of Adoption to an adopted 14person, adoptive parent, or legal guardian who is a registrant 15of the Illinois Adoption Registry.16    (d) The Illinois Adoption Registry shall release the 17actual date and place of birth of an adopted person who is 21 18years of age or over to the birth parent if the birth parent is 19a registrant of the Illinois Adoption Registry and has 20completed a Medical Information Exchange Authorization.21    (e) The Illinois Adoption Registry shall release 22information regarding the date the adoption was finalized and 23the county in which the adoption was finalized to a certified 24confidential intermediary upon submission of a court order.25    (f) In cases where the Illinois Adoption Registry 26possesses information indicating that an adopted person who is   SB3871- 8 -LRB104 19111 JRC 32556 b121 years of age or over was adopted in a state other than 2Illinois or a country other than the United States, the 3Illinois Adoption Registry shall release the name of the state 4or country where the adoption was finalized and, if available, 5the agency involved in the adoption to a registrant of the 6Illinois Adoption Registry, provided the registrant is not the 7subject of a Denial of Information Exchange and the registrant 8has completed a Medical Information Exchange Authorization.9    (g) Any of the above available information for any 10adoption proceedings completed before the effective date of 11this Act shall be supplied to the adoptive parents or an 12adoptee 18 years of age or over upon request.13    (h) The agency, Department of Children and Family 14Services, Court Supportive Services, Juvenile Division of the 15Circuit Court, the Probation Officers of the Circuit Court and 16any other governmental bodies having any of the above 17information shall retain the file until the adoptee would have 18reached the age of 99 years.19(Source: P.A. 99-832, eff. 1-1-17.)